dev/monodix/result.id.dix
    <pardef n="mengajarkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajarkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalat__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalati__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalatinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalatkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalatkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalatnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajarkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajarkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajari__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajarinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajari__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajarinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beragama__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berpahaman__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berorientasikan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berkeahlian__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="ke-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berpengalaman__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="peN-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berperawakan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="per-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="katakan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diberhentikan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="ber"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diberhentikannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="ber"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajarkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajarkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalat__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalati__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalatinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalatkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalatkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalatnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajarkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajarkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajari__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajarinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajari__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajarinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ditertawakan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="ter"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ditertawakannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="ter"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="isi"><p><l>berisi</l><r>isi</r></p><par n="beragama__n"/></e>
    <e lm="putra"><p><l>berputra</l><r>putra</r></p><par n="beragama__n"/></e>
    <e lm="simpul"><p><l>berkesimpulan</l><r>simpul</r></p><par n="berkeahlian__n"/></e>
    <e lm="untung"><p><l>keberuntungan</l><r>untung</r></p><par n="berkeahlian__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciri"><p><l>bercirikan</l><r>ciri</r></p><par n="berorientasikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="istri"><p><l>beristrikan</l><r>istri</r></p><par n="berorientasikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lawan"><p><l>berlawanan</l><r>lawan</r></p><par n="berpahaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pangkal"><p><l>berpangkalan</l><r>pangkal</r></p><par n="berpahaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daya"><p><l>pemberdayaan</l><r>daya</r></p><par n="berpengalaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>pemberlakuan</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="berpengalaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cat"><p><l>dicat</l><r>cat</r></p><par n="diajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ganti"><p><l>diganti</l><r>ganti</r></p><par n="diajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pinggir"><p><l>dipinggir</l><r>pinggir</r></p><par n="diajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landas"><p><l>dilandasi</l><r>landas</r></p><par n="diajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tugas"><p><l>ditugasi</l><r>tugas</r></p><par n="diajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jalan"><p><l>dijalaninya</l><r>jalan</r></p><par n="diajarinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="milik"><p><l>dimilikinya</l><r>milik</r></p><par n="diajarinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jabar"><p><l>dijabarkan</l><r>jabar</r></p><par n="diajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sebab"><p><l>disebabkan</l><r>sebab</r></p><par n="diajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guna"><p><l>digunakannya</l><r>guna</r></p><par n="diajarkannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kata"><p><l>dikatakannya</l><r>kata</r></p><par n="diajarkannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bawah"><p><l>dibawahnya</l><r>bawah</r></p><par n="diajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="derita"><p><l>dideritanya</l><r>derita</r></p><par n="diajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="henti"><p><l>diberhentikan</l><r>henti</r></p><par n="diberhentikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>diberlakukan</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="diberhentikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>diberlakukannya</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="diberhentikannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuan"><p><l>dipertuan</l><r>tuan</r></p><par n="diperalat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caya"><p><l>dipercayai</l><r>caya</r></p><par n="diperalati__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senjata"><p><l>dipersenjatai</l><r>senjata</r></p><par n="diperalati__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>dipelajarinya</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="diperalatinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hati"><p><l>diperhatikan</l><r>hati</r></p><par n="diperalatkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ta"><p><l>dipertanyakan</l><r>ta</r></p><par n="diperalatkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>mempelajari</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="memperalati__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>mempelajarinya</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="memperalatinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>memperlakukan</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="memperalatkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taruh"><p><l>mempertaruhkan</l><r>taruh</r></p><par n="memperalatkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keliling"><p><l>mengelilingi</l><r>keliling</r></p><par n="mengajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sponsor"><p><l>mensponsori</l><r>sponsor</r></p><par n="mengajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keliling"><p><l>mengelilinginya</l><r>keliling</r></p><par n="mengajarinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nikah"><p><l>menikahinya</l><r>nikah</r></p><par n="mengajarinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="darat"><p><l>mendaratkan</l><r>darat</r></p><par n="mengajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="interpretasi"><p><l>menginterpretasikan</l><r>interpretasi</r></p><par n="mengajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saksi"><p><l>menyaksikan</l><r>saksi</r></p><par n="mengajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ganti"><p><l>menggantikannya</l><r>ganti</r></p><par n="mengajarkannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laksana"><p><l>melaksanakannya</l><r>laksana</r></p><par n="mengajarkannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jawab"><p><l>menjawabnya</l><r>jawab</r></p><par n="mengajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rekrut"><p><l>merekrutnya</l><r>rekrut</r></p><par n="mengajarnya__n"/></e>
